Utah statutes.
32A-8-504 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Commission and department duties before granting licenses, and in issuing licenses.

(1)  Before a local industry representative license may be granted by the commission, the department shall conduct an investigation for the purpose of gathering information and making recommendations to the commission as to whether or not a license should be granted. This information shall be forwarded to the commission to aid in its determination.

(2)  Before issuing a local industry representative license, the commission shall:

(a)  determine that the applicant has complied with all basic qualifications and requirements for making application for a license as provided by Sections 32A-8-502 and 32A-8-503, and that the application is complete; and

(b)  consider any other factors or circumstances it considers necessary.

(3)  The commission shall furnish each licensee a license which must be displayed at the licensee's principal place of business.

